Tennessee, session 114, SB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Hollyssee Act."
(b) The purpose of this act is to establish a world-class megasite for arts,
entertainment, and media in this state, fostering economic growth, creativity, and
innovation.
(c) The department of economic and community development is responsible for
the creation of a world-class megasite for arts, entertainment, and media in this state. In
order to support the creation of the megasite, the department shall:
(1) Develop the premises of the megasite by:
(A) Identifying and acquiring a suitable location for selection of
the megasite, after considering factors like accessibility, infrastructure,
and natural resources;
(B) Generating a comprehensive master plan for the megasite,
incorporating input from industry experts, local communities, and state
agencies; and
SB1179
002013
- 1 -

(C) Investing in and conducting any necessary infrastructure
development, including roads, utilities, and public transportation, to
support the megasite's development;
(2) Establish arts, entertainment, and media facilities at the megasite by
coordinating the:
(A) Construction of state-of-the-art soundstages and film
production facilities, which must cater to the needs of film, television, and
commercial productions;
(B) Development of a range of music and performance venues,
including concert halls, theaters, and outdoor amphitheaters;
(C) Establishment of a collection of art galleries and museums,
which can be utilized to showcase local, national, and international art;
and
(D) Creation of dedicated facilities for virtual and augmented
reality experiences, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship;
(3) Establish training and workforce development programs that:
(A) Focus on arts, entertainment, and media-related skills by
partnering with local educational institutions; and
(B) Provide career opportunities, including internships,
apprenticeships, and job placement by fostering partnerships between the
megasite and industry leaders;
(4) Foster economic development and incentives by:
(A) Offering competitive tax incentives for businesses and
productions that are located within the megasite;
- 2 - 002013

(B) Providing grants and funding opportunities for arts,
entertainment, and media projects, and for infrastructure development
and workforce training; and
(C) Encouraging public-private partnerships, to support the
development and operation of the megasite;
(5) Establish appropriate governance and management for the megasite
by:
(A) Creating the Tennessee Arts, Entertainment, and Media
Megasite Authority, a governing authority to oversee the development,
operation, and management of the megasite; and
(B) Appointing a board of directors composed of industry experts,
local representatives, and state officials to guide the authority's decision
making; and
(6) Support the funding and implementation of steps necessary to create
the megasite by:
(A) Identifying ongoing funding sources for the megasite,
including public-private partnerships, grants, and tax incentives; and
(B) Establishing a timeline for the development of the megasite,
with milestones and benchmarks designating progress towards the
completion of the megasite.
(d) It is the legislative intent that the general assembly appropriate two hundred
fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund the initial
development phase of the megasite as described in subdivisions (c)(1)–(6).
- 3 - 002013

(e) The department of economic and community development shall promulgate
rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4,
chapter 5, to effectuate this section.
SECTION 2. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 002013